Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1250.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 11-203 of Title 70, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. As used in this section:
1. “Harmful to minors” has the same meaning as provided in
Section 1040.75 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
2. “Library” means a school library, media program, classroom
library, or any other collection of books or other materials, print
or digital, that are maintained by a school district or charter
school or its employees for use by students and that do not qualify
as textbooks approved by the State Textbook Committee pursuant to
Sections 16-101 through 16-124 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes;

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1250 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

3. “Nudity” has the same meaning as provided in Section 1040.75
of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
4. “Obscene” has the same meaning as provided in Section 1024.1
of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
5. “School library” means the library maintained by a school
district or charter school for use by students;
6. “Sexual conduct” means sexual contact, actual or simulated
sexual intercourse, deviate sexual intercourse, rape, sexual
bestiality, masturbation, sado-masochistic abuse, incest,
molestation, necrophilia, or lewd exhibition of the genitals, anus,
or any portion of the female breast below the top of the areola; and
7. “Sexually explicit content” means any communication,
language, or material including a written description, illustration,
photographic image, video image, or audio file that describes,
depicts, or portrays sexual conduct, actual or simulated sexual
intercourse, deviate sexual intercourse, rape, sexual bestiality,
masturbation, sado-masochistic abuse, incest, molestation,
necrophilia, or lewd exhibition of the genitals, anus, or any
portion of the female breast below the top of the areola.
B. By October 1, 2026, and by every October 1 thereafter, each
school district and charter school shall submit to the State
Department of Education a complete listing of all books and other
materials available in its school library. To fulfill the
requirement of this subsection, a school district or charter school
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1250 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

supe rintendent may submit an attestation that the public online
school library catalog or catalogs contain a complete and accurate
list of books and other materials accompanied by the website for
accessing the relevant catalog or catalogs.
C. A library in a school district or charter school shall be
prohibited from having any materials containing or depicting obscene
material, sexual conduct, sexually explicit content, nudity, or
material that is harmful to minors accessible to students under the
age of eighteen (18).
D. Nothing in this section shall prohibit a student from
reading, owning, possessing, or discussing any book obtained without
the assistance or encouragement of a school district or charter
school, its employees, or its libraries; provided, however, nothing
in this section shall be construed to allow a student to bring
materials containing or depicting obscene material, sexual conduct,
sexually explicit content, nudity, or material that is harmful to
minors on the grounds of a school district or charter school.
E. 1. The parent or legal guardian of a student enrolled in a
school district or charter school may report suspected violations of
the provisions of this section to the school district board of
education or the charter school governing body. The report shall
include a written complaint summarizing the alleged violation
including the time, date, and location of the alleged violation and
the identity of any person involved.
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1250 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

2. Within fourteen (14) business days of receiving a report
pursuant to this subsection, the school district board of education
or charter school governing body shall conduct an investigation to
determine whether a violation occurred. The school district board
of education or charter school governing body shall notify the
parent or legal guardian who submitted the report of the findings of
the investigation.
3. A parent or legal guardian who submits a report pursuant to
this subsection may appeal the findings of the school district board
of education or charter school governing body to the State
Department of Education. The appeal shall include a copy of the
report submitted to the school district board of education or
charter school governing body pursuant to paragraph 1 of this
subsection and the investigation findings reported pursuant to
paragraph 2 of this subsection. The State Department of Education
shall conduct an investigation to determine whether a violation
occurred. The Department shall notify the parent or legal guardian
who submitted the report and the school district or charter school
of the findings of the investigation.
4. If the Department determines a violation occurred, the
school district or charter school shall have fourteen (14) business
days to request a hearing before the State Board of Education. The
Board shall review the alleged violation, the findings of the
Department’s investigation, and the response from the school
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1250 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

dist rict or charter school and vote on whether to uphold the
Department’s determination.
5. If the State Board of Education votes to uphold the State
Department of Education’s determination, the Board is authorized to
report a school district or charter school as deficient on the
accreditation report for noncompliance with the provisions of this
section. Upon a finding of noncompliance with the provisions of
subsections B and C of this section by the State Board of Education,
the noncompliant school district or charter school shall receive a
five-percent reduction in state funding for the fiscal year
following the fiscal year of noncompliance.
F. The State Board of Education shall promulgate rules to
implement the provisions of this section.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON EDUCATION
February 24, 2026 - DO PASS AS AMENDED BY CS





SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1250 SFLR Page 5
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)